Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.140

Vacancies.

(1) The council of a town may declare a council position vacant if that councilmember is absent from the town for three consecutive council meetings without the permission of the council.

(2) A vacancy in an elective office shall occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW. An incumbent councilmember is eligible to be appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of mayor.

(3) A vacancy in any other office shall be filled by appointment by the mayor.

[ 2008 c 50 s 3; 1994 c 223 s 22; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.140. Prior: (i) 1903 c 113 s 6; 1890 p 199 s 146; RRS s 9167. (ii) 1907 c 228 s 5, part; RRS s 9203, part.]